src/fst/morphology/phonology.xfscript
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2
! or any later version.

!====================
!FST-rules in Tokelau
!====================

! ======================== !
! Phonological definitions !
! ======================== !
echo
echo <<< Making the Tokelau phonological component >>>
echo
echo <<< Defining the phonological inventory >>>

define stops [ b | B | d | D | g | G | p | P | t | T | K | k | c | C | q | Q | x | X ] ;
define cont  [ f | F | v | V | w | W | r | R | s | S | j | J | l | L | h | H | y | Y | z | Z ] ; 
define nas   [ m | M | n | N ] ; 
define cns   [ stops | cont | nas ] ;
define vow       [ i | e | a | o | u | ā | ē | ō | ī | ū | Ā | Ē | Ō | Ī | Ū ] ;  
define dummy     [ %> |  %^R | %^R1 | %^R2 | %^E | %^E1 | %^E2 | %^3S | %^T | %^A | ] ;
define segment   [ cns | vow | foreign | dummy ] ; ! dummy as segment??? XXX 
define flags     [ %@U%.verb%.sg%@ | %@U%.verb%.pl%@ ] ;



!********************
!Phonological rules *
!********************

echo
echo <<< Defining the phonological rules >>>

define REdupR [ %^R -> b || _ %^E %> b vow ,,
                %^R -> d || _ %^E %> d vow ,,
                %^R -> g || _ %^E %> g vow ,,
                %^R -> p || _ %^E %> p vow ,,
                %^R -> t || _ %^E %> t vow ,,
                %^R -> k || _ %^E %> k vow ,,
                %^R -> f || _ %^E %> f vow ,,
                %^R -> v || _ %^E %> v vow ,,
                %^R -> r || _ %^E %> r vow ,,
                %^R -> s || _ %^E %> s vow ,,
                %^R -> j || _ %^E %> j vow ,,
                %^R -> l || _ %^E %> l vow ,,
                %^R -> h || _ %^E %> h vow ,,
                %^R -> m || _ %^E %> m vow ,,
                %^R -> n || _ %^E %> n vow ] ;

define REdupE [ %^E -> a || _ %> cns a ,,
                %^E -> e || _ %> cns e ,,
                %^E -> i || _ %> cns i ,,
                %^E -> o || _ %> cns o ,,
                %^E -> u || _ %> cns u ,,
                %^E -> y || _ %> cns y ] ;



! ============= !
! Cleanup rules !
! ============= !

echo
echo <<< Defining the cleanup rules >>>


define FullRedupCleanup ~[ ?* "ˆ[" ~$["ˆ]"] ] & ~[ ~$["ˆ["] "ˆ]" ?* ] ;

define DummyDeletion [ dummy -> 0 ] ;

define LongVowelOrthography [ а а -> ā , e e -> ē , i i -> ī , o o -> ō , u u -> ū , 
                              A a -> Ā , E e -> Ē , I i -> Ī , O o -> Ō , U u -> Ū ] ; 

!************* 
!The cascade *
!*************

echo
echo <<< Compiling our rules... >>>

read regex [
     REdupR
.o. REdupE
.o. FullRedupCleanup
.o. DummyDeletion 
.o. LongVowelOrthography
] ;

echo <<< Done, congratulations! >>>
